Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2591.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1951, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1951. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" includes one or more of the state agencies consolidated into the department of economic security by this chapter. 2. "Apprenticeship" means a formal, structured, earn-and-learn training model that combines paid, supervised on-the-job learning with related technical instruction pursuant to the United States Department of labor standards for registering apprenticeship programs to develop competent and skilled workers in an industry-recognized occupation. 7. 3. "Community work and training" means work, training or job development which that will be provided through a plan jointly entered into by the department and an agency, department, board or commission of the this state or the federal government,  or a county, city, political subdivision or private agency. Such work, training or job development will take place in and about public or private works or improvements and will utilize use labor and services required to be performed where feasible by those eligible for this program. 2. 4. "Comprehensive plan" means an evaluation of client needs and the availability of services to meet these needs within the this state. 3. 5. "Council" means the economic security council. 4. 6. "Department" means the department of economic security. 5. 7. "Director" means the director of the department of economic security. 6. 8. "State plan" means any of the several state plans which that establish the federal-state contractual relationships necessary for federal funding. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 41-1955, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1955. Duty of department concerning employment stabilization, ex-offender rehabilitation, income maintenance and manpower development; research studies The department, with the advice and aid of its advisory councils, shall: 1. Take appropriate steps to reduce and prevent unemployment and dependency,  and to assist in alleviating the economic and social impact of unemployment and dependency on the person and his the person's family. 2. Encourage and assist in the adoption of adopting practical methods of manpower services, occupational training, vocational counseling and guidance, vocational rehabilitation and retraining, supportive services and other such services the director deems appropriate. 3. Research, recommend, advise and assist in the establishment of establishing community or area facilities, public and private, or both, to provide an integration of direct services and programs for the development of the developing this state's manpower and the reduction of reducing dependency. 4. Promote the effective utilization use of unemployed and under-utilized under-used workers. 5. Aid in the rehabilitation of rehabilitating employable ex-offenders, in cooperation with the department of corrections. An ex-offender, by accepting the assistance provided for by this article, shall not be disqualified from receiving further assistance from any other state agency to which he the ex-offender is legally entitled. 6. Be the state registration agency for apprenticeship functions prescribed by the federal government. 7. Carry out and publish the results of research studies for the purpose of this chapter. END_STATUTE